src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON FÁA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
              +V+Inf:fáa    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:fái    Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fært   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fær    Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:fær    Pass    ;
       +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:fáa    Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:fekk   Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:fekst  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:fekk   Pass ;
       +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:fingu  Pass ;
           +V+Imp+Sg:fá     # ;
           +V+Imp+Pl:fáið   # ;
                    :fing   p26 ;
              +V+Sup:fingið # ;

LEXICON NÁA !
!! **@LEXNAME@** XXX check
              +V+Inf:náa  # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:nær  Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:nært # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:nær  Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:nær  Pass ;
       +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:náa  Pass ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:náddi # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:náddi # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:náddi # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:náddu # ;
           +V+Imp+Sg:ná   # ;
           +V+Imp+Pl:náið # ;
                    :ná   p26 ;
              +V+Sup:nátt # ;

LEXICON LIGGJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:iggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:iggi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:igg      urPass ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:igg      urPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:iggja    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:á        Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ást      #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:á        Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ógu      Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:igg      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:iggið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:iggjandi VANDI ;
               :ig       p26  ;
         +V+Sup:igið     #  ;


LEXICON RADA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:ráða    #   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:ráði    Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:ræð     urPass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:ræð     urPass   ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:ráða    Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:ráddi   Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:ráddi   Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:ráddi   Pass   ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:ráddu   Pass   ;
       +V+Imp+Sg:ráð     #   ;
       +V+Imp+Pl:ráðið   #   ;
       +V+PrsPrc:ráðandi VANDI  ;
              :rá      sup_tt ;

LEXICON BURDA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:burda # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:burdi   Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:burdi   Pass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:burdi   Pass   ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:burdu   Pass   ;

LEXICON GJALDA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:gjalda     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:gjaldi     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gjaldi     rPass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gjaldar    #   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gjaldi     rPass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gjaldar    #   	;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:gjalda     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:gjaldaði   Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:gjaldaði   Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:gjaldaði   Pass   	;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:gjaldaðu   Pass   	;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:guldu      Pass   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:gjald      #   	;
       +V+Imp+Pl:gjaldið    #   	;
       +V+PrsPrc:gjaldandi  VANDI  	;
          +V+Sup:goldið     #		;
                :gold       p26 	;

LEXICON VALDA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:valda     	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:valdi     	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veld      	iurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veld      	urPass  ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:valda     	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:voldi	   	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:voldi	   	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:voldi	   	Pass    ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:voldu   	Pass   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:vald		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:valt		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Pl:valdið		#   	;
       +V+PrsPrc:valdandi	VANDI  	;
          +V+Sup:volt		#		;
                :vold       p26 	;

LEXICON FALLA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:falla     	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:falli     	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fel      	lurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:fel      	iurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:fel      	lurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:fel      	iurPass ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:falla    	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:fall	   	#    	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:fal	   	lPass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:fal	   	lPass   ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:fullu   	Pass   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:fall		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Pl:fallið		#   	;
       +V+PrsPrc:fallandi	VANDI  	;
          +V+Sup:fallið		#		;
                :fal        p34_7 	;

LEXICON GJALLA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:gjalla     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:gjalli     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gel      	lurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:gel      	iurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gel      	lurPass ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:gel      	iurPass ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:gjalla    	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:gall	   	#    	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:gal	   	lPass   ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:gal	   	lPass   ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:gullu   	Pass   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:gjall		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Pl:gjallið	#   	;
       +V+PrsPrc:gjallandi	VANDI  	;
          +V+Sup:gollið		#		;
                :gol        p34_7 	;

LEXICON BREGDA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
          +V+Inf:bregða     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:bregði     Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:bregð      urPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:bregð      urPass  ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:bregða    	Pass   	;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:brá	   	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:bregðaði	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:brá	   	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:bregðaði	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:brá	   	Pass    ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:bregðaði	Pass    ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:brugðu   	Pass   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:bregð		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Sg:bregða		#   	;
       +V+Imp+Pl:bregðið	#   	;
       +V+PrsPrc:bregðandi	VANDI  	;
          +V+Sup:bregðað	#		;
                :brugð      p26 	;

LEXICON SYNGJA !
!! **@LEXNAME@** XXX check
         +V+Inf:syngja    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:syngi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:syng      urPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:syng      urPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:syngja    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:sang      Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sang      stPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:sang      Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:sang      Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:sungu     Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:syng      #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:syngið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:syngjandi VANDI ;
               :sung      p26  ;
         +V+Sup:sungið    #  ;



LEXICON HOGGA !
!! **@LEXNAME@** høgga
         +V+Inf:høgga    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:høggi    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:høgg     urPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:høgg     urPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:høgga    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:høgdi    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:høgdi    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:høgdi    Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:høgdu    Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:høgg     #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:høggið   #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:høggandi VANDI ;
               :høg      p7  ;
         +V+Sup:høgt     #  ;

LEXICON KVODA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:kvøða    	#  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:kvøði    	Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:kvøð     	urPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:kvøð     	urPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:kvøða    	Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:kvað   		Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvað   		Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:kvað     	stPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:kvað     	Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:kvóðu    	Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:kvøð    	#  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:kvøðið   	#  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:kvøðandi 	VANDI ;
               :kvøð            p26  ;
         +V+Sup:kvøðið  	#  ;



LEXICON FLYGGJA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
         +V+Inf:flýggja    #  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:flýggi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:flýggja   rPass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:flýggja   rPass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:flýggja    Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:flýddi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:flýddi     Pass  ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:flýddi     Pass  ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:flýddu     Pass  ;
      +V+Imp+Sg:flýggja    #  ;
      +V+Imp+Pl:flýggið    #  ;
      +V+PrsPrc:flýggjandi VANDI ;
               :flý        p18  ;
         +V+Sup:flýtt      #  ;


LEXICON VAKSA
!! **@LEXNAME@**
                 +V+Inf:vaksa    #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+1Sg:vaksi    Pass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+2Sg:veks     urPass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prs+3Sg:veks     urPass  ;
          +V+Ind+Prs+Pl:vaksa    Pass  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+1Sg:vaks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+2Sg:vaks     #  ;
         +V+Ind+Prt+3Sg:vaks     #  ;
          +V+Ind+Prt+Pl:vuksu    Pass  ;
              +V+Imp+Sg:vaks     #  ;
              +V+Imp+Pl:vaksið   #  ;
              +V+PrsPrc:vaksandi VANDI ;
                       :vaks     p18  ;
                 +V+Sup:vaksið   #  ;
