src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
liggja:l LIGGJA ; ! strong verb to lie
fáa: FÁA ;
náa: NÁA ;
ráða: RADA ;
syngja: SYNGJA ;
fyriliggja:fyri#l LIGGJA ; ! strong verb to lie
gjalda: GJALDA ;
endurgjalda:endur# GJALDA ;
afturgjalda:aftur# GJALDA ;
niðurgjalda:niður# GJALDA ;
burda: BURDA ;
valda: VALDA ;
falla: FALLA ;
døggfalla:døgg# FALLA ;
gjalla: GJALLA ;
bregða: BREGDA ;
hálshøgga:háls# HOGGA ;
grovhøgga:grov# HOGGA ;
munnhøgga:munn# HOGGA ;
høgga: HOGGA ;
flýggja: FLYGGJA ;
útflýggja:út# FLYGGJA ;
innflýggja:inn# FLYGGJA ;
vaksa: VAKSA ;
bráðvaksa:bráð# VAKSA ;
skundvaksa:skund# VAKSA ;
kvøða: KVODA ;
skotkvøða:skot# KVODA ;
